src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
efendi+N:efˈendi PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
egalitaarlane+N:egalit˘aarlane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
egalitarism+N:egalitar˘ism TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@egiid+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eg˘iid TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
egiptlane+N:eg˘iptlane SUULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
egiptlanna+N:egˈiptlanna PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@ego+N:@D.Stem.Guessed@ego PERE  "weight: 9 " ; 
egoism+N:ego˘ism TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@egoist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ego˘ist TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
egotism+N:egot˘ism TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@egotsentrik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ego%#tsentrik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@egotsentrilisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ego%#ts˘entrilisus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
egotsentrism+N:ego%#tsentr˘ism TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@egüptoloog+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ˈegüptol˘oog TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
egüptoloogia+N:egüptol˘oogia AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@R.Part.One@eha+N:@R.Part.One@eha KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehakuma+N:eha%#kuma KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehaline+N:ehaline OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehalkäija+N:ehal%#k˘äija AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehapuna+N:eha%#puna KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ehavalgus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eha%#v˘algus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@ehe+N:@D.Stem.Guessed@˘ehT1e%{stemill%}%{rare%} PINGE  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ehedus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ehedus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ehhinokokk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ehhinok˘okk TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehholaalia+N:ehhol˘aalia AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ehis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ehis SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehisaednik+N:ehis%#˘aedn˘ik ÄMBLIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehitaja+N:ehitaja AASTA  "weight: 8 " ; 
ehitamine+N:ehitamine OLULINE  "weight: 7 " ; 
ehitatu+N:ehitatu AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ehitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ehitus OLULINE  "weight: 6 " ; 
ehitusettevõtja+N:ehitus%#˘ette%#v˘õtʲja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehitusfirma+N:ehitus%#firma PERE  "weight: 9 " ; 
ehitusjärk+N:ehitus%#j˘ärk%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehituskivi+N:ehitus%#kivi%>%{pl.e%}%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehituskonstruktsioon+N:ehitus%#konstruktsi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehituskooperatiiv+N:ehitus%#kˈooperat˘iiv TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ehituskorraldus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ehitus%#korraldus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehituskrunt+N:ehitus%#kr˘unʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehituskunst+N:ehitus%#k˘unʲst TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
ehituslugu+N:ehitus%#luG1u%{stemill%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehitusmaterjal+N:ehitus%#materjal TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
ehitusmees+N:ehitus%#me MEES  "weight: 10 " ; 
ehitusmeister+N:ehitus%#m˘eister%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
ehitusosakond+N:ehitus%#ˈosak˘onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehitusplats+N:ehitus%#pl˘atʲs TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ehitusseadus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ehitus%#s˘eadus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ehitustegevus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ehitus%#tegevus OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
ehitusturg+N:ehitus%#t˘urG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 10 " ; 
ehitustöö+N:ehitus%#t˘öö%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 8 " ; 
ehitustööline+N:ehitus%#t˘ööline SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehmatamine+N:ehmatamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ehmatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ehmatus OLULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ehmes+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ehme KOTKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehmumine+N:˘ehmumine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ehmus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ehmus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehteasi+N:˘ehte%#˘asʲJ1%>%{pl.u%} ASI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehtekaup+N:˘ehte%#k˘aup%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ehtsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ehtsus SUULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
ei-sõna+N:˘ei-sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eideetik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eideetik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
eideke+N:eideke PEENIKE  "weight: 10 " ; 
eideköbi+N:eide%#köbi KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
eiderhani+N:eider%#hanʲ NIMI  "weight: 11 " ; 
eidetism+N:eidet˘ism TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
eidetudi+N:eide%#tudʲi KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
eikellegimaa+N:ei%#kellegi%#m˘aa%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 10 " ; 
eimidagitegemine+N:ei%#midagi%#tegemine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
eimiski+N:ei%#m˘iski AASTA  "weight: 9 " ; 
eine+N:˘eine PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
einela+N:˘einela AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
einelaud+N:˘eine%#l˘auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
einestamine+N:einestamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@einestus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@einestus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@einetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@einetus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@einsats+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘eins˘atʲs TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@einsteinium+N:@P.Stem.Nom@einst˘einium TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
eiraja+N:˘eiraja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
eiramine+N:˘eiramine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@eit+N:@D.Stem.Guessed@˘eit%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} EIT  "weight: 8 " ; 
eitamine+N:˘eitamine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘eitus SUULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
eitussõna+N:˘eitus%#sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ejakulatsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ejakulatsi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ekipaaž+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ˈekip˘aaž TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@R.Part.One@@P.Stem.Nom@ekker+N:@R.Part.One@@P.Stem.Nom@˘ekker%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
eklampsia+N:ekl˘ampsia AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ekleer+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekl˘eer TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eklektik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eklˈektik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
eklektika+N:eklˈektika AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
eklektitsism+N:eklektits˘ism TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
ekliptika+N:eklˈiptika AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ekläär+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekl˘äär TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ekossees+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ˈekoss˘ees TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ekraan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekr˘aan TAUD  "weight: 7 " ; 
ekraanipilt+N:ekrˈaani%#p˘ilʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
ekraaniteos+N:ekrˈaani%#t˘eos SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Stem.Single@eks+N:@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Stem.Single@˘eks TAUD  "weight: 5 " ; 
eksabikaasa+N:˘eks%#abi%#kaasa PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksaltatsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksaltatsi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksalteeritus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksalteeritus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
eksalteerunu+N:eksalt˘eerunu AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksam+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘eksam REDEL  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksaminaator+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksamin˘aator REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksaminand+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksamin˘and TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
eksamineerija+N:eksamin˘eerija AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
eksamineeritav+N:eksamineeritav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
eksamipäev+N:˘eksami%#p˘äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ekseem+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eks˘eem TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksegees+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ˈekseg˘ees TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksegeet+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ˈekseg˘eet TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
eksegeetika+N:eksegeetika AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
eksekuteerija+N:eksekut˘eerija AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksekutsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksekutsi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksekuutor+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksek˘uutor REDEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksempel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eks˘empel%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksemplar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksemplar TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
ekshibitsionism+N:ekshibitsion˘ism TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ekshumatsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekshumatsi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksiarvamus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksi%#˘arvamus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksiil+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eks˘iil TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksiilvalitsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eks˘iil%#valitsus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksimatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘eksimatus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
eksimine+N:˘eksimine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksimus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘eksimus OLULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
eksinu+N:˘eksinu AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
eksirada+N:eksi%#raJ1D1a%>%{pl.u%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
eksisamm+N:eksi%#s˘amm%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
eksisteerimine+N:eksist˘eerimine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksistents+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ˈeksist˘ents TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
eksistentsialism+N:eksistentsial˘ism TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
eksitaja+N:eksitaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
